North Carolina, session 2025, SB465.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143-341 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-341. Powers and duties of Department.
The Department of Administration has the following powers and duties:
(1) Repealed by Session Laws 1979, 2nd Session, c. 1137, s. 38.
(2) Purchase and Contract:
a. To exercise those powers and perform those duties which were, at the
time of the ratification of this Article, conferred by statute upon the
former Division of Purchase and Contract.
…
(4) Real Property Control:
a. To prepare and keep current a complete and accurate inventory of all
land owned or leased by the State or by any State agency. This
inventory shall show the location, including the latitude and longitude
of the center of the property, acreage, description, source of title and
current use of all land (including swamplands or marshlands) owned
by the State or by any State agency, and the agency to which each tract
is currently allocated. Surveys may be made where necessary to obtain
information for the purposes of this inventory. Accurate plats or maps
of all such land may be prepared, or copies obtained where such maps
or plats are available.
b. To prepare and keep current a complete and accurate database of all
buildings owned or leased (in whole or in part) by the State or by any
State agency. This database shall serve as the State inventory and shall
include all of the following information and floor plans of every such
building shall be prepared or copies obtained where such floor plans
are available, where needed for use in the allocation of space therein:
1. The building's location, including the latitude and longitude of
the center of the building.
2. A description of the operations supported by the building.
3. The agency or agencies that occupy the building.The current
occupant of the building or, if the building is vacant, the current
period of vacancy.
*S465-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
4. Ownership information for the building.
5. The size of the building in terms of both gross and usable
square feet.
6. A description of the building.
7. The building's condition assessment, including the estimated
cost to make needed repairs and renovations as well as the date
that the last condition assessment was completed.
8. The building's annual operating costs.
9. The building's annual maintenance costs.
9a. The total potential liability to the State for the building and the
land where the building is situated.
10. The number of usable workspaces contained in the building.
11. The number of full-time equivalent positions assigned to the
building by each agency occupant.
12. The amount of the building that is utilized, measured in
accordance with the procedures developed pursuant to
G.S. 143-341.2(a)(3).
13. Maintenance record, including replacement and maintenance
schedules for all major mechanical systems.
14. Parking and employee facilities.
15. Any other information deemed relevant by the Department of
Administration.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 143-341.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-341.2. Proactive management of State-owned and State-leased real property
portfolio.
(a) Duties of the Department of Administration. – The Department of Administration
shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) Development of comprehensive State facilities plan. – No later than April 1,
2023, and every five years thereafter, the Department of Administration shall
develop and implement a plan to comprehensively manage, acquire, and
dispose of the facilities and spaces required to fully support State government
operations. The plan shall do all of the following:
a. Identify the type, quantity, and location of facilities and spaces
required to fully support State government operations.
b. Include an in-depth analysis of existing State-owned facilities'
locations, capability, utilization, occupancy status, and condition.
c. Establish strategic priorities and objectives that allow the Department
of Administration to manage the performance of the State's portfolio
of real property in a way that maximizes the utilization of State-owned
facilities and minimizes operating and maintenance costs.
d. Take into consideration the information provided to the Department in
five-year real property management plans submitted by State agencies
pursuant to subdivision (b)(4) of this section.
e. Provide a mechanism for allocating available facilities or space to
State agencies that need it in a manner that reduces the need to acquire
new space through purchase, lease, or other means.
f. Provide recommendations for disposing of existing State property and
facilities, consolidating operations among existing facilities, and
relocating State agencies from leased facilities to State-owned
facilities.
Page 2 Senate Bill 465-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
g. Describe all changes made to space planning standards developed and
distributed as provided in subdivision (4) of this subsection.
h. Identify potential facilities eligible for surplus disposal under
G.S. 143-341.3.
(2) Development of performance management system. – The Department of
Administration shall establish a performance management system to measure
the State's achievement of the priorities and objectives set forth in plans
developed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this section. The system shall set
measurable goals and deadlines and shall be designed to focus on optimization
and efficiency of the State's portfolio of real property. The system shall be
used to report the information required by sub-sub-subdivision (7)c.1. of this
section.
(3) Development of utilization measures. – The Department of Administration
shall develop and distribute to State agencies procedures to be used to measure
the utilization of State-owned and State-leased real property. The procedures
developed pursuant to this subdivision shall be all of the following:
a. Based on the percentage of usable square feet in a facility that is used
for State agency functions or for storage, or on other trade industry
standards of utilization measurement.
b. Adjusted as appropriate for each facility type.
c. Designed to yield an easily understandable index or ratio of facility
utilization.
d. Developed in consultation with State agencies.
(4) Development and enforcement of space planning standards. – The Department
of Administration shall develop and distribute to State agencies space
planning standards to be used to determine workspace size and to govern the
use of shared space. The standards developed pursuant to this subdivision
shall be based on the Federal GSA's Office of Real Property Management
Performance Measurement Division Workspace Utilization and Allocation
Benchmark report unless the Department identifies another efficient industry
standard upon which to base the space planning standards developed pursuant
to this subdivision. The Department shall:
a. Annually perform audits of a portion of State agencies to determine
each agency's adherence to the space planning standards developed
pursuant to this subdivision and shall send formal letters of
admonishment to any agency that fails to justify, in the sole discretion
of the Department, any deviation from those standards.
b. Update the space planning standards developed pursuant to this
subdivision at least once every five years and distribute those changes
to State agencies.
(5) Updating of real property inventories. – The Department of Administration
shall do all of the following to ensure that the information contained in the
inventories maintained pursuant to G.S. 143-341(4) is kept current:
a. Immediately incorporate information received from State agencies
pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) of this section into the inventories.
b. Immediately notify State agencies when the incorporation of
information into the inventories required by sub-subdivision a. of this
subdivision is complete.
(6) Development of surplus property identification and disposal system. – The
Department of Administration shall establish a surplus real property disposal
system that limits the duration that unneeded property is retained by the State.
Senate Bill 465-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
As part of the system, the Department shall adopt rules defining surplus
State-owned real property and establishing a system for continuously
identifying and disposing of that property, subject to the approvals required
by Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, which shall take into consideration all
of the following:
a. The value each facility or parcel of land brings to the performance of
the mission of the State or State agency and the fulfillment of its goals
and objectives.
b. A general measure of the facility's condition calculated as a ratio of
repair needs to replacement value.
c. The degree to which the property is utilized, measured in accordance
with the procedures developed pursuant to subdivision (3) of this
subsection.
d. The extent to which the property meets the purpose for which it was
intended.
e. The extent to which the State or State agency is likely to need to
continue to provide the service or function currently provided at the
property.
f. Consideration of the best and most cost-effective manner in which
these future needs can be met.
(7) Reporting. – The Department of Administration shall make the following
reports:
a. No later than April 1, 2023, and every five years thereafter, the
Department shall report the following to the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations and Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Capital Improvements, Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on General Government, and Fiscal Research
Division:
1. The plan developed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
2. A summary of the performance measurement procedures
developed pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection.
b. If any State agency fails to submit the information required by
subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the Department shall report the
failure to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations, the chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Capital Improvements, and the chairs of the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government within 30
days.
c. No later than April 1, 2024, and each year thereafter, the Department
shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental
Operations, Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Capital
Improvements, Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General
Government, and Fiscal Research Division on the State's portfolio of
real property. This report shall include at least the following
information:
1. The status of achieving the goals and objectives set forth in the
most recent plan developed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
section.
Page 4 Senate Bill 465-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2. Trends in the inventory of leased and owned buildings and real
property, including changes in value, square footage, and
operation and maintenance costs.
3. Trends in the inventory of State-owned land, including
changes in acreage and value.
4. Allocation of leased and owned space by facility type, by
agency, and by county.
5. Benchmarks for comparable private sector leases across the
regions of the State for both rural and urban locations, as
appropriate.
6. An analysis of utilization targets and a list of owned and leased
real property identified as unused or underutilized.
7. A list of the following information for the period beginning
after submission of the most recent report pursuant to this
sub-subdivision:
I. State-owned properties identified as unused or
underutilized.
II. State-owned properties sold.
III. State-owned properties in the process of being disposed
of.
IV. Properties reallocated between State agencies.
8. A list of all audits performed that year pursuant to
sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (4) of this subsection, a
summary of the findings of each audit, and the agency's plans
for addressing the findings of the audit.
(b) Duties of Other State Agencies. – Each State agency shall have the following powers
and duties:
(1) Collection and reporting of information on property use. – No later than
November 1, 2022, and each year thereafter, each State agency shall submit
to the Department of Administration all of the information described in
G.S. 143-341(4)b.1. through 15. for each building, facility, or space in any
building or facility that the agency occupies. This shall be in addition to any
reports required pursuant to G.S. 143-341(4)h.
(2) Verification of information in real property inventories. – Within 60 days of
receiving notice from the Department of Administration pursuant to
sub-subdivision (a)(5)b. of this section, each State agency shall report to the
Department one of the following, as applicable:
a. That the information submitted to the Department of Administration
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection is accurately reflected in
the real property inventories.
b. A list of discrepancies between the information submitted to the
Department of Administration pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection and the corresponding information in the real property
inventories.
(3) Auditor may audit submissions. – The State Auditor may audit submissions
made to the Department of Administration pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection and may recover any costs incurred in performing such an audit
from the State Land Fund, in accordance with G.S. 146-72.
(4) Development of five-year property management plan. – No later than
November 1, 2022, and every five years thereafter, each State agency shall
develop a five-year real property management plan and shall submit the plan
Senate Bill 465-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to the Department of Administration for review. Each plan shall do all of the
following:
a. Identify the type, quantity, and location of facilities and spaces
required to fully support agency operations.
b. Include an in-depth analysis of existing facilities' locations,
capabilities, utilization, and condition.
c. Establish agency-specific strategic priorities and objectives for each
asset under its control.
(c) Exception for Property Not Subject to Department of Administration Oversight. –
None of the requirements of this section shall apply to facilities that are not subject to the real
property oversight of the Department of Administration under G.S. 143-341. A State agency that
is entirely exempt from the real property oversight of the Department of Administration shall not
be required to submit any information pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. A State agency
that is partially exempt from the real property oversight of the Department of Administration
shall submit information pursuant to subsection (b) of this section for those properties that are
subject to the real property oversight of the Department of Administration."
SECTION 3. Part 1 of Article 36 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143-341.3. Disposal of surplus real property.
(a) Surplus Real Property Disposal. – The Department of Administration shall establish
a surplus real property disposal system that limits the duration that unneeded or vacant property
is retained by the State. As part of the system, the Department shall (i) adopt rules in accordance
with this section, including defining surplus State-owned real property, and (ii) establish a system
for continuously identifying and disposing of that property, subject to the approvals required
under Chapter 146 of the General Statutes, which shall take into consideration all of the
following:
(1) The value each facility or parcel of land brings to the performance of the
mission of the State or State agency and the fulfillment of its goals and
objectives.
(2) A general measure of the facility's condition calculated as a ratio of repair
needs to replacement value.
(3) The degree to which the property is utilized, measured in accordance with the
procedures developed pursuant to G.S. 143-341.2(a)(3).
(4) The extent to which the property meets the purpose for which it was intended.
(5) The extent to which the State or State agency is likely to need to continue to
provide the service or function currently provided at the property.
(6) Consideration of the best and most cost-effective manner in which these future
needs can be met.
(7) Whether the property has been vacant for one year or longer.
(8) An assessment of private or public interest in the property.
(b) Method for Disposal. – For properties identified as surplus pursuant to this section,
the Department of Administration shall, subject to the approvals required under Chapter 146 of
the General Statutes, dispose of the surplus real property by sale. If the Department of
Administration is unable to dispose of the real property by sale for a period of six months, the
Department shall dispose of the property by auction or by transfer of title to a city or county in
this State, provided that the city or county presents evidence satisfactory to the Department of an
economic development use for the property.
(c) Proceeds of Sale. – Notwithstanding G.S. 146-15, G.S. 146-30, or any other provision
of law, the gross proceeds of the sale of surplus real property under this section shall be handled
in accordance with the following priority:
Page 6 Senate Bill 465-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) First, by subtracting any expenses incurred incident to the sale as may be
allowed under rules and regulations adopted by the Governor and approved
by the Council of State.
(2) Second, in accordance with the provisions of any trust or other instrument of
title whereby title to real property was acquired.
(3) Third, as provided by any other act of the General Assembly.
(4) Fourth, by depositing the remaining proceeds in accordance with the
following:
a. Fifty percent (50%) to the General Fund.
b. Fifty percent (50%) to the Department of Administration to be used
for repair and renovation projects as provided in G.S. 143C-8-13."
SECTION 4. No later than three months after the effective date of this section, the
Department of Administration shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on General Government and the Fiscal Research Division with the vacant building data required
under G.S. 143-341, as enacted in this act.
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Senate Bill 465-First Edition Page 7